Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General

§ 19-5-1.
Examination of county jail.

At least annually, and as often as it may think proper, the board of supervisors, or a competent person authorized by the board of supervisors, shall examine into the state and condition of the jail, in regard to its safety, sufficiency and accommodation of the prisoners, and from time to time take such legal measures as may best tend to secure the prisoners against escape, sickness and infection, and have the jail cleansed. If it shall appear from such examination that the sheriff has neglected his duty in the manner of keeping the jail, or keeping and furnishing the prisoners, the board shall fine him, as for a contempt, in any sum not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

The board of supervisors shall not authorize the sheriff or any member of his department to make the inspections required by this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 59, art 19; 1871, § 1366; 1880, § 2147; 1892, § 310; 1906, § 329; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3702; 1930, § 235; 1942, § 2913; Laws, 1986, ch. 315, eff from and after passage (approved March 7, 1986).

§ 19-5-3.
Purchase and upkeep of law enforcement dogs.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase and keep on hand, for the use of the sheriffs, hounds of the best breeding and training. The board, when such hounds have been purchased by them, shall allow out of the general county funds a reasonable sum of money for the purchase of said hounds, and a reasonable amount for the monthly care and maintenance of said hounds. When such hounds have not been purchased the board may allow the sheriff a reasonable amount for hire of hounds in attempting the capture of criminals charged with capital crimes.

Likewise the board of supervisors of any county in the state is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase by negotiation or otherwise, any breed of dogs suitable for law enforcement purposes and pay for same out of the general fund of the county. Said law enforcement dogs may be furnished to the sheriff of said county or to any other law enforcement officer to be used by him or them in the enforcement of the laws in said county. The board of supervisors may also appropriate and pay monthly such amounts as may be necessary to care for and maintain said law enforcement dogs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 330; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3703; 1930, § 236; 1942, § 2914; Laws, 1896, ch. 139; Laws, 1962, ch. 244, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 19-5-5.
Acquisition and operation of radio stations for law enforcement.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to purchase the necessary and suitable equipment required to install a complete radio base station, including mobile units to be installed in cars and motor boats, after having legally advertised for same as required by law, and to maintain the same and to make such necessary repairs and to purchase replacements and parts so as to keep the same in good order as may be necessary for the efficient operation of said station. The said radio station shall be operated by the sheriffs of said counties for law enforcement purposes. All of the expenses of said station may be borne by any available funds of said counties, including its general fund. However the board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to purchase new or used two-way shortwave equipment without first advertising for same as required by law, provided the total cost of said two-way shortwave equipment shall not exceed the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

Any county may cooperate with one or more counties in purchasing and maintaining the radio base station herein authorized, and in such event, the cost may be prorated among them by contract.

Any county may cooperate with any municipality located in said county in purchasing and maintaining the radio base station herein authorized, and in such event, the cost may be prorated between said county and municipality by contract. Said county and municipality may employ such dispatcher or dispatchers as in their opinion may be necessary to operate such radio base station.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2914.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 279, § 1, eff date June 3, 1964.

§ 19-5-7.
Employment of school crossing guards.

The board of supervisors of (a) any county in this state having a population in excess of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) according to the 1990 federal census, and an assessed valuation in excess of Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) as shown by the last completed assessment for taxation, and (b) any county in this state having a population of at least thirty-eight thousand (38,000), according to the latest federal decennial census, having one (1) completely constructed highway bridge and an additional highway bridge at least fifty percent (50%) constructed which cross the Mississippi River resulting in a high volume of vehicular traffic in the county, and which has only one (1) public school district in the county, shall be authorized, in its discretion, to employ school crossing guards.

The board of supervisors of the county described in “(a)” above may pay each of the guards employed by it a monthly amount to be established by the board of supervisors, and the board of supervisors of the county described in “(b)” above may pay each of the guards employed by it an amount not to exceed Three Hundred Fifty Dollars ($350.00) per month. Any such board may purchase and furnish the school crossing guards with suitable uniforms.

The board of supervisors of any county which employs school crossing guards under the authority of this section shall annually spread upon its official minutes the total number of school crossing guards employed by the county, including the names of and compensation paid to each of such school crossing guards.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2988.3; Laws, 1971, ch. 435, §§ 1 and 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 352, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 501; Laws, 1999, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after Oct. 1, 1999.

§ 19-5-9.
Adoption of building and other related codes in certain counties.

The construction codes published by a nationally recognized code group which sets minimum standards and has the proper provisions to maintain up-to-date amendments are adopted as minimum standard guides for building, plumbing, electrical, gas, sanitary, and other related codes in Mississippi. Any county within the State of Mississippi, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, may adopt building codes, plumbing codes, electrical codes, sanitary codes, or other related codes dealing with general public health, safety or welfare, or a combination of the same, within but not exceeding the provisions of the construction codes published by nationally recognized code groups, by order or resolution in the manner prescribed in this section, but those codes so adopted shall apply only to the unincorporated areas of the county. However, those codes shall not apply to the erection, maintenance, repair or extension of farm buildings or farm structures, except as may be required under the terms of the “Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973, ” and shall apply to a master planned community as defined in Section 19-5-10 only to the extent allowed in Section 19-5-10. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to authorize the adoption of any code which applies to the installation, repair or maintenance of electric wires, pipelines, apparatus, equipment or devices by or for a utility rendering public utility services, required by it to be utilized in the rendition of its duly authorized service to the public. Before any such code shall be adopted, it shall be either printed or typewritten and shall be presented in pamphlet form to the board of supervisors at a regular meeting. The order or resolution adopting the code shall not set out the code in full, but shall merely identify the same. The vote or passage of the order or resolution shall be the same as on any other order or resolution. After its adoption, the code or codes shall be certified to by the president and clerk of the board of supervisors and shall be filed as a permanent record in the office of the clerk who shall not be required to transcribe and record the same in the minute book as other orders and resolutions.

If the board of supervisors of any county adopts or has adopted construction codes which do not have proper provisions to maintain up-to-date amendments, specifications in such codes for cements used in portland cement concrete shall be superseded by nationally recognized specifications referenced in any code adopted by the Mississippi Building Code Council.

All provisions of this section shall apply to amendments and revisions of the codes mentioned in this section. The provisions of this section shall be in addition and supplemental to any existing laws authorizing the adoption, amendment or revision of county orders, resolutions or codes.

Any code adopted under the provisions of this section shall not be in operation or force until sixty (60) days have elapsed from the adoption of same; however, any code adopted for the immediate preservation of the public health, safety and general welfare may be effective from and after its adoption by a unanimous vote of the members of the board. Within five (5) days after the adoption or passage of an order or resolution adopting that code or codes the clerk of the board of supervisors shall publish in a legal newspaper published in the county the full text of the order or resolution adopting and approving the code, and the publication shall be inserted at least three (3) times, and shall be completed within thirty (30) days after the passage of the order or resolution.

Any person or persons objecting to the code or codes may object in writing to the provisions of the code or codes within sixty (60) days after the passage of the order or resolution approving same, and if the board of supervisors adjudicates that ten percent (10%) or more of the qualified electors residing in the affected unincorporated areas of the county have objected in writing to the code or codes, then in such event the code shall be inoperative and not in effect unless adopted for the immediate preservation of the public health, safety and general welfare until approved by a special election called by the board of supervisors as other special elections are called and conducted by the election commissioners of the county as other special elections are conducted, the special election to be participated in by all the qualified electors of the county residing in the unincorporated areas of the county. If the voters approve the code or codes in the special election it shall be in force and in operation thereafter until amended or modified as provided in this section. If the majority of the qualified electors voting in the special election vote against the code or codes, then, in such event, the code or codes shall be void and of no force and effect, and no other code or codes dealing with that subject shall be adopted under the provisions of this section until at least two (2) years thereafter.

After any such code shall take effect the board of supervisors is authorized to employ such directors and other personnel as the board, in its discretion, deems necessary and to expend general county funds or any other funds available to the board to fulfill the purposes of this section.

For the purpose of promoting health, safety, morals or the general welfare of the community, the governing authority of any municipality, and, with respect to the unincorporated part of any county, the governing authority of any county, in its discretion, is empowered to regulate the height, number of stories and size of building and other structures, the percentage of lot that may be occupied, the size of the yards, courts and other open spaces, the density or population, and the location and use of buildings, structures and land for trade, industry, residence or other purposes, but no permits shall be required except as may be required under the terms of the “Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973” for the erection, maintenance, repair or extension of farm buildings or farm structures outside the corporate limits of municipalities.

The authority granted in this section is cumulative and supplemental to any other authority granted by law.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, any code adopted by a county before or after April 12, 2001, is subject to the provisions of Section 41-26-14(10).

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the Boards of Supervisors of Jackson, Harrison, Hancock, Stone and Pearl River Counties shall enforce the requirements imposed under Section 17-2-1 as provided in such section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2890.7, 2890.8; Laws, 1962, ch. 266, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 274; Laws, 1974, ch. 530; Laws, 2000, ch. 590, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 587, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 541, § 6; Laws, 2008, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008.).

§ 19-5-10.
Authority to enter into development agreements for master planned communities; “master planned community” defined; modification of master plan; “dwelling unit” defined.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized to enter into one or more development agreements with the developer or developers of a master planned community in order to authorize, in addition to any other matters to which the board of supervisors may lawfully obligate the county, the master planned community, through a community self-governing entity created by the owners of the property, to administer, manage and enforce the land use restrictions and covenants, land use regulations, subdivision regulations, building codes and regulations, and any other limitations and restrictions on land and buildings provided in the master plan for the master planned community, in lieu of the real estate and property owners within the master planned community being subject to the county ordinances and regulations pertaining to buildings, subdivisions, zoning, the county’s comprehensive plan, and any other county ordinances and regulations pertaining thereto. Prior to entering into any such development agreement, the board of supervisors shall review the master plan for the master planned community and find that the provisions of the master plan providing for regulations, restrictions, covenants and limitations pertaining to building, subdivisions, zoning and comprehensive planning shall be comparable to, or greater than, similar provisions in the ordinances and regulations of the county. The term of such a development agreement may be not more than thirty (30) years or the number of years allowed in the county’s subdivision ordinance for terms of subdivision covenants, whichever is greater. The development agreement shall have attached to it a boundary survey made by a registered land surveyor, and upon approval of the development agreement by the board of supervisors, the boundary survey shall be recorded in the land records of the chancery clerk of the county. The recorded boundary survey shall serve as the description of the property within the master planned community which shall not be subject to the county’s zoning map, and the county’s zoning map shall simply recognize the territory described in such boundary survey as a “master planned community.” Whenever there may be a conflict between the county ordinances and regulations pertaining to buildings, subdivisions, zoning, the county’s comprehensive plan, and any other county ordinances and regulations pertaining thereto, and the provisions of such a development agreement, including the provisions of the master plan providing for regulations, restrictions, covenants and limitations pertaining to buildings, subdivisions, zoning and comprehensive planning, the provisions of the development agreement shall prevail if the provisions of the development agreement are comparable to or greater than similar provisions of county ordinances and regulations.

As used in this section, the term “master planned community” means a development by one or more developers of real estate consisting of residential, commercial, educational, health care, open space and recreational components that is developed pursuant to a long range, multi-phase master plan providing comprehensive land use planning and staged implementation and development and the master plan must include the following minimum provisions:

The real estate described in the master plan must consist of not less than two thousand five hundred (2,500) acres. The master plan may require that not less than fifty percent (50%) of the total dwelling units planned for such acreage must be:

Dwelling units within a certified retirement community certified by the Mississippi Development Authority; or

Dwelling units where at least one (1) occupant:

1. Is sixty-two (62) years of age; or

2. Receives pension income reported on his or her most recent federal income tax return filed prior to occupancy; or

3. Declares himself to be retired.

The real estate described in the master plan must be subjected to a set of land use restrictions imposed by deed restriction or restrictive covenants recorded by the developer in the land records of the chancery clerk of the county as land is developed and sold in phases to users. Such restrictions shall include design guidelines and standards that provide for:

Internal community self-governance by the owners of the property;

The establishment of one or more legal persons endowed with the powers, rights and duties to administer, manage, own and maintain common areas, establish community activities and enforce the land use restrictions on the common areas and private property; and

The establishment of assessments and lien rights to fund amenities, services and maintenance of common areas.

The real estate described in the master plan must be within the territorial boundaries of one or more public utility districts established by the county for the provision of water and sewer facilities and water and sewer services.

The master plan for a master planned community shall be subject to modification from time to time by the original owner or owners of the real estate described in the initial master plan, its affiliates, successors or assigns to meet changing economic and market conditions; provided, however, any such modifications in the master plan which materially change the regulations, restrictions, covenants and limitations pertaining to buildings, subdivisions and land use regulations approved in the development agreement, or which significantly change the overall plan concept, shall be subject to, and shall not take effect until, approved by the board of supervisors of the county.

As used in this section, the term “dwelling unit” means single-family residences, apartments or other units within a multi-family residence, or a room or apartment in a nursing home or congregate-care facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 590, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 19-5-11.
Compensation for destruction of certain diseased livestock.

The board of supervisors of any county may, in their discretion, pay to the owner compensation not exceeding the value of any farcied or glandered stock killed heretofore by the sheriff under the provisions of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 399; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3776; 1930, § 264; 1942, § 2949; Laws, 1906, ch. 122.

§ 19-5-13.
Compensation for cattle killed or injured in dipping process.

Any person in any county in this state shall be entitled to recover from such county reasonable compensation for any livestock owned by such person that may be killed or permanently injured in the process of dipping or as a result of such dipping for the eradication of the cattle tick, where such dipping was done under the supervision of the board of supervisors or the livestock sanitary board.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3807a; Laws, 1930, § 265; Laws, 1942, § 2950; Laws, 1917, ch. 38.

§ 19-5-15.
Burial of livestock dying as result of epidemic; burial of poultry dying as result of natural or man-made disaster or emergency situation.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized to use the road equipment and employees of the county to bury livestock which died as a result of an epidemic, whenever any licensed veterinarian shall certify to the board or any member thereof that there is an epidemic, contagious disease, among the livestock of the county or any portion of the county and immediate burial is necessary in order to prevent the spread of a contagious disease and would be in the best interest of the community wherein livestock have contracted such disease.

If a concentrated animal feeding operation contains at least ten thousand (10,000) heads of poultry per house, the board of supervisors of any county may use the road equipment and employees of the county to bury the poultry that has died as the result of a natural or man-made disaster or other emergency situation;

The board shall spread upon its minutes an order declaring that it will be the policy of the board to bury such poultry as authorized by this section;

Any poultry buried under this section shall be buried according to the requirements and regulations of the Mississippi Board of Animal Health;

Before the county buries poultry, the owner shall give written permission and execute a release and waiver of liability to the county for any loss or damages that may result from the burying of the poultry.

Any livestock or poultry buried under this section shall be buried on the premises of the owner of the livestock or poultry, the property provided by the owner, or an approved site.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2951.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 222; Laws, 2011, ch. 528, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 19-5-17.
Establishment and maintenance of rubbish and garbage disposal systems; civil action for recovery of delinquent fees and charges.

After December 31, 1992, the board of supervisors of any county in the state shall provide for the collection and disposal of garbage and the disposal of rubbish, and for that purpose is required to establish, operate and maintain a garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems; to acquire property, real or personal, by contract, gift or purchase, necessary or proper for the maintenance and operation of such system; to make all necessary rules and regulations for the collection and disposal of garbage and/or rubbish and, if it so desires, to establish, maintain and collect rates, fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish; and, in its discretion, to enter into contracts, in the manner required by law, with individuals, associations or corporations for the establishment, operation and maintenance of a garbage and rubbish disposal system or systems, and/or to enter into contracts on such terms as the board of supervisors thinks proper with any municipality, other county or region, enabling the county to use jointly with such municipality, other county or region any collection system, authorized rubbish landfill or permitted sanitary landfill operated by the municipality, other county or region. The board of supervisors shall designate by order the area to be served by the system. All persons in the county generating garbage shall utilize a garbage collection and disposal system. However, this provision shall not prohibit any person from managing solid waste generated by such person in any municipal solid waste management facility owned by the generator.

As a necessary incident to such county’s power and authority to establish, maintain and collect such rates, fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and as a necessary incident to such county’s power and authority to establish, operate and maintain a garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems, the board of supervisors of such county shall have the authority to initiate a civil action to recover any delinquent fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, in the event any person, firm or corporation, including any municipal corporation, shall fail or refuse to pay such fees and charges for collecting and disposing of garbage and/or rubbish; provided that such board of supervisors may initiate such a civil action to recover such delinquent fees and charges whether or not such county has previously entered into a contract with such individual, firm or corporation, including a municipal corporation, relating to the establishment, operation and maintenance of such garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems; provided, further, that in a civil action to recover such delinquent fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, the county shall in all respects be a proper party to such suit as plaintiff and shall have the power to sue for and recover such unpaid fees and charges and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, from any person, firm or corporation, including a municipal corporation, as may fail, refuse or default in the payment of such fees and charges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2912.7; Laws, 1966, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 495; Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 27; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 19-5-18.
Development of billing and collection system.

To defray the cost of establishing, operating and maintaining the system provided for in Section 19-5-17, the board of supervisors may develop a system for the billing and/or the collection of any fees or charges imposed on each person furnished garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal service by the county or at the expense of the county. The board of supervisors may designate, by resolution, a county official to collect the fees or charges. If the board of supervisors designates an elected county official to collect the fees or charges, the board of supervisors shall pay the reasonable costs incurred in collecting the fees or charges. The county official so designated shall notify the board of supervisors monthly of any unpaid fees or charges assessed under Section 19-5-21. The sheriff of the county, in accordance with the performance of his regular duties, shall assist in the collection of any delinquent fees or charges.

The board of supervisors may enter into a contract upon mutual agreement with a public or private corporation, nonprofit corporation, planning and development district or a public agency, association, utility or utility district within the county and/or the area receiving garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services from the county for the purpose of developing, maintaining, operating and administering a system for the billing and/or collection of fees or charges imposed by the county for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services. The entity with whom the board of supervisors contracts shall notify the board of supervisors monthly of any unpaid fees or charges assessed under Section 19-5-21. Any entity that contracts to provide a service to customers, within the area being served by the county’s garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system, may provide a list of its customers to the board of supervisors upon the request of the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 29; Laws, 1994, ch. 624, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 19-5-19.
Authority of counties to grant tax exemptions for property surrounding certain public landfills; credit against services received from regional authority in amount of tax revenues lost.

Any county which locates, develops, owns or operates a municipal solid waste management facility within the county, or any county within which is located or developed a municipal solid waste management facility that is part of a local nonhazardous solid waste management plan approved by the Commission on Environmental Quality in accordance with Section 17-17-227, on its own behalf or as a member of a regional authority, is authorized to grant a tax abatement or exception from ad valorem taxation in an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the tax amended and levied against the real property located directly adjacent and surrounding the site of such facility or such other property within are made of the site which is determined by the board of supervisors to be impacted by the location and operation of the site.

Any county, which is a member of a regional authority, and which grants the tax exemption authorized herein for a municipal solid waste management facility site of the regional authority, shall receive a credit against services received from the regional authority in an amount commensurate with the tax revenue lost as a result of tax exemptions granted pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).